en: Lighters & Matches
xx: Lighters & Matches
cs: Zapalovače a zápalky
da: Lightere og tændstikker
de: Feuerzeuge & Streichhölzer
es: Encendedores y cerillas
fr: Briquets et allumettes
it: Accendini e fiammiferi
ja: ライター・マッチ
nl: Aanstekers en lucifers
no: Lightere og fyrstikker
pl: Zapalniczki i zapałki
pt: Isqueiros e palitos de fósforo
ru: Зажигалки и спички
sv: Tändare och tändstickor
tr: Çakmaklar ve Kibritler

en: Log Splitters
xx: Log Splitters
cs: Štípače dřeva
da: Brændeflækkere
de: Holzspalter
es: Cortadoras de troncos
fr: Fendeuses de bûches, Fendeur de bûches thermique
it: Spaccalegna
ja: 薪割機
nl: Houtklovers
no: Vedkløvere
pl: Rozdrabniacze do drewna
pt: Cortadores de lenha
ru: Дровоколы
sv: Vedklyvar
tr: Odun Yarma Makineleri

en: Magnetic Sweepers
xx: Magnetic Sweepers
cs: Zvedací magnety
da: Løftemagneter
de: Lasthebemagnete
es: Imanes de levantamiento
fr: Balais magnétiques
it: Elettromagneti da sollevamento
ja: リフティングマグネット
nl: Hefmagneten
no: Løftemagneter
pl: Magnesy podnoszące
pt: Ímãs de levantamento
ru: Подъёмные магниты
sv: Lyftmagneter
tr: Kaldırma Mıknatısları

en: Marking Tools
xx: Marking Tools
cs: Značkovací nástroje
da: Markeringsværktøjer
de: Markierwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para marcar
fr: Outils de traçage
it: Attrezzi per marcatura
ja: マーキング用品
nl: Markeermiddelen
no: Merkeverktøy
pl: Narzędzia znakujące
pt: Ferramentas de marcação
ru: Инструменты для разметки
sv: Markeringsverktyg
tr: İşaretleme Aletleri

en: Masonry Tools
xx: Masonry Tools
cs: Zednické nástroje
da: Mureværktøj
de: Bauwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas de albañilería
fr: Outils de maçonnerie
it: Attrezzi per muratura
ja: 左官・舗装用ツール
nl: Benodigdheden voor metselen
no: Murerverktøy
pl: Narzędzia murarskie
pt: Ferramentas para alvenaria
ru: Инструменты для каменной кладки
sv: Murningsverktyg
tr: Duvarcı Aletleri

en: Brick Tools
xx: Brick Tools
cs: Kladení cihel
da: Redskaber til mursten
de: Maurerwerkzeuge
es: Herramientas para ladrillos
fr: Outils de maçon
it: Attrezzi per murature
ja: レンガ用品
nl: Metselbenodigdheden
no: Mursteinsverktøy
pl: Narzędzia do układania cegieł
pt: Ferramentas para tijolos
ru: Инструменты для кирпичной кладки
sv: Tegelstensverktyg
tr: Tuğla Aletleri

en: Cement Mixers
xx: Cement Mixers
cs: Míchačky
da: Cementblandere
de: Betonmischer
es: Hormigoneras
fr: Bétonnières
it: Betoniere
ja: セメント ミキサー
nl: Betonmolens
no: Sementblandere
pl: Mieszacze do cementu
pt: Misturadores de cimento
ru: Бетономешалки
sv: Cementblandare
tr: Çimento Karıştırıcılar

en: Construction Lines
xx: Construction Lines
cs: Stavební výkresy
da: Hjælpelinjer
de: Maurerschnüre
es: Líneas de construcción
fr: Lignes de construction
it: Corde da costruzione
ja: 水糸
nl: Metseltouwen
no: Hjelpelinjer
pl: Linie pomocnicze
pt: Linhas de construção
ru: Конструктивная арматура
sv: Konstruktionslinjer
tr: Harç Makineleri

en: Floats
xx: Floats
cs: Hladítka
da: Svømmeblærer
de: Glättkellen
es: Llanas
fr: Taloches
it: Frattazzi
ja: 左官フロート
nl: Strijkbord
no: Pussebrett
pl: Pilniki grubozębne
pt: Boias
ru: Мастерки
sv: Putsstålskivor
tr: Sıva Malaları

en: Grout Sponges
xx: Grout Sponges
cs: Zednické houby
da: Fugesvampe
de: Fugenschwamm
es: Esponjas para lechada
fr: Éponges à coulis
it: Spugne per intonaco
ja: グラウト スポンジ
nl: Inwassponzen
no: Kittsvamper
pl: Gąbki do fugowania
pt: Esponjas para parede
ru: Губки для раствора
sv: Putssvamp
tr: Sıva Süngerleri

en: Masonry Edgers & Groovers
xx: Masonry Edgers & Groovers
cs: Lemovačky
da: Kantskærere
de: Kanten- & Schneidwerkzeuge
es: Cortabordes
fr: Dresseuses de maçonnerie
it: Profilatori per bordi
ja: 左官エッジャー
nl: Hoektroffels en voegtrekkers
no: Murerskjeer og kantskjeer
pl: Obrzynarki
pt: Acabamento de bordas
ru: Шлифовальные машины
sv: Kantslevar
tr: Duvar Kenar Malaları ve Oyuk Açıcıları

en: Masonry Jointers
xx: Masonry Jointers
cs: Spárovačky
da: Fugejern
de: Fugenkellen
es: Ensambladores
fr: Fers à joints
it: Jointer muratura
ja: ブロック ジョインター
nl: Voegspijkers
no: Fugejern
pl: Strugi
pt: Plainas para alvenaria
ru: Расшивки
sv: Spackelspadar
tr: Taş Duvar Derz Çubukları

en: Masonry Trowels
xx: Masonry Trowels
cs: Zednické lžíce
da: Murske
de: Maurerkellen
es: Palustres
fr: Truelles
it: Cazzuole
ja: 左官こて
nl: Troffels
no: Murskjeer
pl: Kielnie murarskie
pt: Colheres-de-pedreiro para alvenaria
ru: Кельмы
sv: Murslevar
tr: Taş Duvar Malaları

en: Power Trowels
xx: Power Trowels
cs: Motorové hladiče
da: Glittemaskiner
de: Glättmaschinen
es: Fratasadoras
fr: Talocheuses-lisseuses
it: Frattazzatrici
ja: タンパー、フィニッシャー
nl: Betonvlinders
no: Støpemaskiner
pl: Zacieraczka do betonu
pt: Colheres-de-pedreiro elétricas
ru: Затирочные машины
sv: Automatiska murslevar
tr: Elektrikli Malalar

en: Mattocks & Pickaxes
xx: Mattocks & Pickaxes
cs: Krumpáče
da: Ryddehakker og økser
de: Hacken & Spitzhacken
es: Picos y azadones
fr: Haches et pioches
it: Picconi
ja: つるはし
nl: Houwelen en pikhouwelen
no: Rotøkser og spisshakker
pl: Motyki i kilofy
pt: Enxadões e picaretas
ru: Мотыги и кирки
sv: Hackor och röjhackor
tr: Çapalar ve Kazmalar

en: Measuring Tools & Sensors
xx: Measuring Tools & Sensors
cs: Měřicí nástroje a přístroje
da: Måleredskaber og -sensorer
de: Messwerkzeuge & Messwertgeber
es: Sensores y herramientas de medida
fr: Outils de mesure et détecteurs
it: Strumenti/sensori misurazione
ja: 測定機器・センサー
nl: Meethulpmiddelen en sensoren
no: Måleverktøy og sensorer
pl: Narzędzia pomiarowe i czujniki
pt: Sensores e ferramentas para medição
ru: Измерительные инструменты и датчики
sv: Mätverktyg och sensorer
tr: Ölçüm Aletleri ve Sensörler

en: Air Quality Meters
xx: Air Quality Meters
cs: Měřiče kvality ovzduší
da: Luftkvalitetsmålere
de: Raumluftmessgeräte
es: Medidores de calidad del aire
fr: Appareils de mesure de la qualité de l'air
it: Rilevatori qualità dell'aria
ja: 空気質測定器
nl: Meters voor luchtkwaliteit
no: Luftkvalitetsmålere
pl: Mierniki jakości powietrza
pt: Medidores de qualidade do ar
ru: Датчики качества воздуха
sv: Luftkvalitetsmätare
tr: Hava Kalitesi Ölçüm Cihazları

en: Altimeters
xx: Altimeters
cs: Výškoměry
da: Højdemålere
de: Höhenmesser
es: Altímetros
fr: Altimètres
it: Altimetri
ja: 高度計
nl: Hoogtemeters
no: Høydemålere
pl: Wysokościomierze
pt: Altímetros
ru: Высотомеры
sv: Höjdmätare
tr: Altimetreler

en: Anemometers
xx: Anemometers
cs: Anemometry
da: Vindmålere
de: Windgeschwindigkeitsmesser
es: Anemómetros
fr: Anémomètres
it: Anemometri
ja: 風速計
nl: Windsnelheidsmeters
no: Anemometere
pl: Anemometry
pt: Anemômetro
ru: Анемометры
sv: Vindmätare
tr: Rüzgarölçerler

en: Barometers
xx: Barometers
cs: Barometry
da: Barometre
de: Barometer
es: Barómetros
fr: Baromètres
it: Barometri
ja: 気圧計
nl: Barometers
no: Barometre
pl: Barometry
pt: Barômetros
ru: Барометры
sv: Barometrar
tr: Barometreler